Utah statutes.
53B-8a-111.   Annual audit of financial statements -- Information to governor and Legislature.

(1)  The financial statements of the plan shall be audited annually by the state auditor or the state auditor's designee and reported in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

(2)  The plan shall submit to the governor and the Legislature:

(a)  upon request, any studies or evaluations of the plan;

(b)  upon request, a summary of the benefits provided by the plan including the number of participants and beneficiaries in the plan; and

(c)  upon request, any other information which is relevant in order to make a full, fair, and effective disclosure of the operations of the plan.

